Maryland, session 2025, SB0464.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
11–110.
(b) (1) (i) Funds for the payment of current common expenses and for the
creation of reserves for the payment of future common expenses shall be obtained by
assessments against the unit owners in proportion to their percentage interests in common
expenses and common profits.
(ii) The board of directors of a residential condominium has the
authority to [increase]:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0464*

SENATE BILL 464
1. INCREASE the assessment levied to cover the reserve
funding amount required under § 11–109.4 of this title, notwithstanding any provision of
the declaration, articles of incorporation, or bylaws restricting assessment increases or
capping the assessment that may be levied in a fiscal year; AND
2. INCREASE THE TOTAL ASSESSMENTS LEVIED IN A
FISCAL YEAR TO COVER COMMON EXPENSES OTHER THAN RESERVES BY NOT MORE
THAN 5 PERCENT OF THE TOTAL ASSESSMENTS LEVIED FOR COMMON EXPENSES
OTHER THAN RESERVES IN THE PREVIOUS FISCAL YEAR, NOTWITHSTANDING ANY
PROVISION OF THE DECLARATION, ARTICLES OF INCORPORATION, OR BYLAWS
REQUIRING THAT THE COUNCIL OF UNIT OWNERS APPROVE THE AMOUNT OF AN
ANNUAL ASSESSMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.